Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1507
Existing wellhead protection areas; effect of act.

Any wellhead protection area established before July 15, 1998, by resolution or ordinance of the controlling entity need not be reestablished under the Wellhead Protection Area Act unless controls are proposed. If such controls are proposed, the controls and the boundaries of the wellhead protection area are subject to the requirements of sections 46-1504 to 46-1506. Any wellhead protection area purported to have been established before July 15, 1998, other than by official action of a controlling entity shall be null and void beginning nine calendar months after July 15, 1998, unless reestablished by resolution or ordinance of the controlling entity.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 8.